Colorado, session 2026A, HB1097.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-1-102, amend
(58)(b); and add (102.6) as follows:
42-1-102. Definitions.
As used in articles 1 to 4 of this title 42, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(58) "Motor vehicle":
(b) (I) Includes a low-power scooter for the purposes of sections
42-2-127, 42-2-127.7, 42-2-128, 42-2-138, 42-2-206, 42-4-1301, and
42-4-1301.1; and
(II) INCLUDES A SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE FOR THE PURPOSES
OF:
(A) REQUIRING A DRIVER'S LICENSE TO DRIVE ON A HIGHWAY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 2 OF THIS TITLE 42;
(B) REGISTERING AND TAXING THE VEHICLE PURSUANT TO ARTICLE
3 OR 12 OF THIS TITLE 42 IF THE OWNER HAS ELECTED TO REGISTER THE
-2- HB26-1097

VEHICLE UNDER SECTION 42-3-103 (1)(d); AND
(C) DRIVING THE VEHICLE ON A HIGHWAY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
ARTICLE 4 OF THIS TITLE 42; AND
(102.6) "SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 42-6-102 (20.5).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-3-103, add (1)(d)
as follows:
42-3-103. Registration required or permitted - exemptions -
rules.
(1) (d) (I) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028, THE OWNER OF A
SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE MAY REGISTER THE VEHICLE WITH THE
DEPARTMENT IF:
(A) THE VEHICLE COMPLIES WITH ARTICLE 4 OF THIS TITLE 42;
(B) THE VEHICLE USES WHEELS AND NOT TRACKS FOR MOVEMENT;
(C) THE VEHICLE WEIGHS LESS THAN SIXTEEN THOUSAND POUNDS
EMPTY WEIGHT AND HAS A TWENTY THOUSAND POUNDS GROSS VEHICLE
WEIGHT RATING OR LESS;
(D) THE VEHICLE IS NOT AFFIXED WITH A WORKING MOUNTED
FIREARM; AND
(E) THE OWNER SIGNS AN AFFIDAVIT STATING THAT THE VEHICLE
WILL NOT BE DRIVEN ON ROADWAYS FOR MORE THAN ONE THOUSAND FIVE
HUNDRED MILES PER YEAR.
(II) IF THE OWNER OF A SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE REGISTERS
THE VEHICLE WITH THE DEPARTMENT, THE VEHICLE AND OWNER ARE
SUBJECT TO THIS ARTICLE 3.
(III) THE OWNER OF A SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE MAY REGISTER
THE VEHICLE AS A COLLECTOR'S ITEM UNDER ARTICLE 12 OF THIS TITLE 42
-3- HB26-1097

IF THE SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE IS:
(A) A MILITARY VEHICLE; AND
(B) QUALIFIED TO BE REGISTERED UNDER ARTICLE 12 OF THIS
TITLE 42.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 42-4-109.8 as
follows:
42-4-109.8. Surplus military vehicles.
(1) A SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE THAT IS REGISTERED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 3 OF THIS TITLE 42 MAY BE DRIVEN ON A
HIGHWAY. A SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO THIS ARTICLE 4.
(2) THE OWNER OF A SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE SHALL NOT
DRIVE THE VEHICLE ON OR AUTHORIZE A PERSON TO DRIVE THE VEHICLE
ON A ROADWAY FOR MORE THAN ONE THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED MILES PER
YEAR.
(3) A SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE MAY BE DRIVEN ON A HIGHWAY
IF:
(a) THE SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE IS:
(I) OWNED OR LEASED BY A MUNICIPALITY, COUNTY, OR FIRE
PROTECTION DISTRICT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 32-1-103 (7), FOR THE
PURPOSE OF ASSISTING WITH FIREFIGHTING EFFORTS, INCLUDING
MITIGATING THE RISK OF WILDFIRES; OR
(II) AN AUTHORIZED EMERGENCY VEHICLE; AND
(b) THE SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE IS BEING DRIVEN ON THE
HIGHWAY IN CONNECTION WITH ASSISTING WITH FIREFIGHTING EFFORTS,
OPERATING AS AN AUTHORIZED EMERGENCY VEHICLE, OR BEING
MAINTAINED, SERVICED, OR REPAIRED.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-6-102, amend
-4- HB26-1097

(11.5)(b)(II) as follows:
42-6-102. Definitions.
As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:
(11.5) (b) (II) "Off-highway vehicle" does not include:
(A) A surplus military vehicle that is owned or leased by a
municipality, county, or fire protection district, as defined in section
32-1-103 (7), for the purpose of assisting with firefighting efforts,
including mitigating the risk of wildfires; OR
(B) AN AUTHORIZED EMERGENCY VEHICLE AS DEFINED IN SECTION
42-1-102 (6).
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 42-6-149 as
follows:
42-6-149. Conversion of surplus military vehicle certificate of
title.
A PERSON MAY ELECT TO CONVERT A SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE
CERTIFICATE OF TITLE FROM SHOWING THAT THE VEHICLE IS AN
OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLE TO SHOWING THAT THE VEHICLE IS AUTHORIZED TO
OPERATE ON THE HIGHWAY IF THE VEHICLE IS REGISTERED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 42-3-103 (1)(d). IF THE REGISTRATION EXPIRES, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REVERT THE CERTIFICATE OF TITLE TO SHOW THE
SURPLUS MILITARY VEHICLE IS AN OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLE.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-12-101, amend
the introductory portion and (10) as follows:
42-12-101. Definitions.
As used in this article ARTICLE 12, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(10) "Motor vehicle" means:
-5- HB26-1097

(a) A self-propelled vehicle designed for operation on the highway
and not running on rails; OR
(b) A MILITARY VEHICLE AS DEFINED IN SECTION 42-1-102 (52.5).
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 33-14.5-101, amend
(3)(h) as follows:
33-14.5-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 14.5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(3) "Off-highway vehicle" means any self-propelled vehicle that
is designed to travel on wheels or tracks in contact with the ground,
designed primarily for use off of the public highways, and generally and
commonly used to transport persons for recreational purposes. Except as
described in subsection (3)(h) of this section, "off-highway vehicle"
includes surplus military vehicles as defined in section 42-6-102.
"Off-highway vehicle" does not include the following:
(h) A surplus military vehicle, as defined in section 42-6-102
(20.5), that is:
(I) Owned or leased by a municipality, county, or fire protection
district, as defined in section 32-1-103 (7), for the purpose of assisting
with firefighting efforts, including mitigating the risk of wildfires; OR
(II) AN AUTHORIZED EMERGENCY VEHICLE AS DEFINED IN SECTION
42-1-102 (6).
SECTION 8. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
-6- HB26-1097

or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to applications for registrations submitted on
or after January 1, 2028.
-7- HB26-1097